Ohio, session 136, HB25.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3314.03 and 3326.11 be amended and sections 3301.96, 3313.475, and 5103.62 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3301.96. (A) As used in this section, "student placed in foster care" means a child who at any time during an academic semester or term is in foster care, including any child who is in the custody of a public children's services agency or private child placing agency or otherwise placed with a licensed foster caregiver. "Student placed in foster care" includes a child who transfers enrollment as a result of being returned to the child's home at the conclusion of the child's placement. (B) The director of education and workforce, chancellor of higher education, director of children and youth, and director of job and family services shall collaborate to encourage the sharing of best practices to support students placed in foster care. The directors and chancellor shall each post resources to their respective agency's publicly available web site to assist local foster care education liaisons, foster family navigators, and public children services agencies in supporting the youth which they serve. The chancellor of higher education shall include in this posting any scholarship opportunities for students placed in foster care that are available at each state institution of higher education. (C) The department of education and workforce shall support local foster care education liaisons and foster family navigators established in section 3313.475 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.475. (A) As used in this section, "student placed in foster care" has the same meaning as in section 3301.96 of the Revised Code. (B) Each city, local, and exempted village school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code shall designate a local foster care education liaison to support students in foster care. Local foster care education liaisons shall support the identification, enrollment, and access to academic and non-academic resources for each student placed in foster care. Each district shall post the contact information for its local foster care education liaison on its public-facing web site. A local foster care education liaison shall do all of the following: (1) Coordinate with the local custodial agency point of contact; (2) Create, maintain, and properly document local processes and procedures for best interest determinations that are inclusive of students placed in foster care; (3) Ensure proper identification of students placed in foster care in the education management information system established in section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code based on a change in placement for the student; (4) Facilitate records transfer and immediate enrollment and data sharing; (5) Develop and coordinate local transportation procedures; (6) Manage disputes related to best interest determination and transportation cost; (7) Provide professional development for school personnel to help identify, support, and engage students placed in foster care; (8) Respond to a request from a public children services agency or private child placing agency for input from a school district or school concerning the determination of whether it is in the best interest of the student placed in foster care to remain in the school of origin; (9) Collaborate with the public children services agency or private child placing agency to ensure that any necessary transportation and services are provided for the student placed in foster care to remain in the student's school of origin; (10) If a public children services agency or private child placing agency determines that it is not in the student's best interest to remain in the school of origin, work with the agency, juvenile probation officer, parents, guardian ad litem or counsel for the student, and foster caregivers to ensure that the student is enrolled in a new school immediately with transition planning, and that the student's complete education information and records are requested immediately by the student's new school upon enrollment; (11) Upon receiving the required notification and invitation, participate in a transition planning meeting regarding the enrollment in a public school of a student placed in foster care from a state-licensed day treatment facility or hospital, or having a designee participate in the meeting; (12) Participate, or have the local foster care education liaison's designee participate, in any interagency collaboration team or threat assessment team centered on students placed in foster care, which the school district or school may develop or on which the school district or school may be invited to participate. (C)(1) For each school building operated by a district or school, the district or school shall designate a building staff member as the foster family navigator for that building. The foster family navigator shall serve as the primary point of contact to support the students placed in foster care that attend school in that building. Each foster family navigator shall do all of the following: (a) Collaborate with the family of each student placed in foster care that is attending the school; (b) Provide support to students placed in foster care, including by requesting and obtaining a copy of the student's life skills assessment performed under section 5103.62 of the Revised Code for planning and service provision; (c) Provide access to academic and non-academic services to students placed in foster care; (d) Engage with each student placed in foster care that is attending the school at least one time per semester; (e) Support the full engagement and participation in school activities for all students placed in foster care in accordance with section 2151.316 of the Revised Code; (f) For students in grades nine through twelve, identify resources available to students placed in foster care for attending college, including all of the following: (i) Free application for federal student aid prescribed in 20 U.S.C. 1090; (ii) Federal Pell grant prescribed in 20 U.S.C. 1070a; (iii) Federal supplemental education opportunity grant prescribed in 34 C.F.R. 676; (iv) Chafee educational and training voucher program grant prescribed in 42 U.S.C. 677; (v) Ohio college opportunity grant prescribed in section 3333.122 of the Revised Code; (vi) Any extended foster care benefits; (vii) Any grant or scholarship opportunity that is specific to an institution of higher education; (viii) Any private sources of scholarship or grant opportunities; (ix) Any other state and federal grants that may be available to the student. (g) For students in grades nine through twelve, help students placed in foster care make a plan to attend college, enter a career training program, or enter the workforce; (h) Identify resources to help a student placed in foster care successfully complete high school graduation requirements established under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. (2) Each school operated by a district, community school, and STEM school shall post publicly the contact information for each of its foster family navigators on the school's publicly available web site. (3) A community school or STEM school that only operates one building may designate the same individual to fulfill the duties of both the local foster care education liaison under division (B) of this section and the foster family navigator under division (C) of this section. (D) Not later than six months after the effective date of this section, the department of education and workforce shall collaborate with the departments of children and youth, higher education, and job and family services to develop a training for the local foster care education liaisons and foster family navigators. The department of education and workforce shall be responsible for the posting and administration of the training. Local foster care education liaisons and foster family navigators shall complete the training developed under this division at least once per year. Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under this section shall be filed with the director of education and workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed contract filed with the director under this section. (A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school shall specify the following: (1) That the school shall be established as either of the following: (a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 2003; (b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. (2) The education program of the school, including the school's mission and educational philosophy, the characteristics of the students the school is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the focus of the curriculum; (3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those goals, which shall include the statewide achievement assessments; (4) Performance standards, including but not limited to all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the school will be evaluated by the sponsor; (5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised Code; (6)(a) Dismissal procedures; (b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the student. (7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; (8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of state. The contract shall require financial records of the school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 117.10 of the Revised Code. (9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities to be used that contains at least the following information: (a) A detailed description of each facility used for instructional purposes; (b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility that are paid by or on behalf of the school; (c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments that are paid by the school; (d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the operator, if any. (10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the following: (a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code, except that a community school may engage noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; (b) A prohibition against the school employing an individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in any position. (11) That the school will comply with the following requirements: (a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred twenty hours per school year. (b) The governing authority will purchase liability insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of the school. (c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or religious institution. (d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3301.96, 3302.037, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.475, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. (e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 2921.42 of the Revised Code. (f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or (F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency adopted by the department under divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall comply with the framework for granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education developed by the department under division (J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (g) The school governing authority will submit within four months after the end of each school year a report of its activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled in the school. (h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, the school will pay teachers based upon performance in accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (j) If the school operates a preschool program that is licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. (k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district unless it is either of the following: (i) An internet- or computer-based community school; (ii) A community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. (l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the Revised Code. (m) The school will comply with section 3313.7118 of the Revised Code if it serves elementary school students. (12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits to employees; (13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division (D) of this section. (14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; (15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. (16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition of employees of the school in the event the contract is terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code; (17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all or part of an existing public school or educational service center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is a converted public school or service center building, both of the following: (a) Specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer that the board of education or service center governing board that operated the school or building before conversion is delegating to the governing authority of the community school with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining agreement applicable to such employees; (b) Alternative arrangements for current public school students who choose not to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not to teach in the school or building after conversion. (18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the governing authority of the community school; (19) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located. That policy shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: (a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located; (b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in districts adjacent to the district in which the school is located; (c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any other district in the state. (20) A provision recognizing the authority of the department to take over the sponsorship of the school in accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code; (21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; (22) A provision recognizing both of the following: (a) The authority of public health and safety officials to inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; (b) The authority of the department as the community school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such action. (23) A description of the learning opportunities that will be offered to students including both classroom-based and non-classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance with criteria for student participation established by the department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code; (24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall be taken by the sponsor of the school. (25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of September each school year, unless the mission of the school as specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. (26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; (27) That the school's attendance and participation policies will be available for public inspection; (28) That the school's attendance and participation records shall be made available to the department, auditor of state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of the Revised Code; (29) If a school operates using the blended learning model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all of the following information: (a) An indication of what blended learning model or models will be used; (b) A description of how student instructional needs will be determined and documented; (c) The method to be used for determining competency, granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; (d) The school's attendance requirements, including how the school will document participation in learning opportunities; (e) A statement describing how student progress will be monitored; (f) A statement describing how private student data will be protected; (g) A description of the professional development activities that will be offered to teachers. (30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear interest at a fair market rate; (31) A provision requiring that, if the governing authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity shall be independent from the operator with which the school has contracted. (32) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a student's parent to notify the community school in which the student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of the parent's or student's primary residence. (33) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a student residence and address verification policy for students enrolling in or attending the school. (34) A provision establishing the process by which the governing authority of the school will be selected in the future. (35) A description of the management and administration of the school. (36) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt policies and procedures to establish internal financial controls for the school. (B) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school may provide for the community school governing authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school receives from the state. (C) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code and shall include the following: (1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the contract; (2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal performance and the organization and operation of the community school on at least an annual basis; (3) Provide technical assistance to the community school in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the contract; (4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; (5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the event the community school experiences financial difficulties or closes prior to the end of a school year. (D) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the academic goals prescribed in the contract have been satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. (E) If a community school fails to open for operation within one year after the contract entered into under this section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A school shall not be considered permanently closed because the operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under this chapter and its governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3301.96, 3302.037, 3313.14, 3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.475, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.7118, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3319.90, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. Sec. 5103.62. (A) A public children services agency or private child placing agency shall provide independent living services to each youth in the custody of the agency as developmentally appropriate to prepare the youth for the transition from agency custody to self-sufficiency. (B) The public children services agency or private child placing agency is to determine which independent living services are applicable or not needed based on a life skills assessment conducted by the agency. The services may include all of the following: (1) Academic support; (2) Post-secondary educational support; (3) Career preparation; (4) Employment programs or vocational training; (5) Budget and financial management; (6) Housing, education, and home management training; (7) Health education and risk prevention; (8) Family support and healthy relationship and marriage education, including education and information about safe and stable families, healthy marriages, spousal communication, parenting, responsible fatherhood, childcare skills, teen parenting, and domestic and family violence prevention; (9) Mentoring; (10) Supervision services for a youth placed in a supervised independent living arrangement, including a youth who is living independently under a supervised arrangement paid for or provided by the county agency; (11) Room and board financial assistance for rent, deposits, utilities, and other household start-up expenses; (12) Financial assistance, including direct cash assistance or other payments made or provided by the county agency to help the youth gain independence. (C) Upon the request of a foster family navigator pursuant to section 3313.475 of the Revised Code, a public children services agency or private child placing agency shall provide the foster family navigator serving a youth who is in the custody of the agency with a copy of the youth's life skills assessment required under division (A) of this section. Section 2. That existing sections 3314.03 and 3326.11 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. This act shall be known as the Fostering School Success Act. Section 4. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.